District of Columbia statutes.
25-713

Retail licensee required to post current legal drinking age and notice of requirement to produce valid identification displaying proof of age.

A retail licensee shall post a notice, maintained in good repair and in a place clearly visible from the point of entry to the establishment, stating:

(1)

The minimum age required for the purchases of an alcoholic beverage; and

(2)

The obligation of the patron to produce a valid identification document displaying proof of legal drinking age.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 331, ch. 4, § 20
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 901, ch. 756, § 10
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 104, ch. 159, § 404(g)
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, § 12, 29 DCR 3617
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-106, § 2, 31 DCR 3381
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-178, § 2(a), 33 DCR 7654
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 12, 34 DCR 907
Sept. 11, 1993, D.C. Law 10-12,§ 2(c), 40 DCR 4020
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(i), 41 DCR 1658
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
1981 Ed., § 25-713.
1973 Ed., § 25-121.